test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-nouns2-Oct_2016_gt-norm.yaml
    õukond+N+Pl+Ade: õukondadel
    õukond+N+Pl+All: õukondadele
    õukond+N+Pl+Com: õukondadega
    õukond+N+Pl+Ela: õukondadest
    õukond+N+Pl+Ess: õukondadena
    õukond+N+Pl+Gen: õukondade
    õukond+N+Pl+Ill: õukondadesse
    õukond+N+Pl+Ine: õukondades
    õukond+N+Pl+Nom: õukonnad
    õukond+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: õukondasid
    õukond+N+Pl+Par: õukondi
    õukond+N+Pl+Tra: õukondadeks
    õukond+N+Pl+Trm: õukondadeni
    õukond+N+Sg+Abe: õukonnata
    õukond+N+Sg+Abl: õukonnalt
    õukond+N+Sg+Ade: õukonnal
    õukond+N+Sg+All: õukonnale
    õukond+N+Sg+Com: õukonnaga
    õukond+N+Sg+Ela: õukonnast
    õukond+N+Sg+Ess: õukonnana
    õukond+N+Sg+Gen: õukonna
    õukond+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Hyp: õukonnasse
    õukond+N+Sg+Ill: õukonda
    õukond+N+Sg+Ine: õukonnas
    õukond+N+Sg+Nom: õukond
    õukond+N+Sg+Par: õukonda
    õukond+N+Sg+Tra: õukonnaks
    õukond+N+Sg+Trm: õukonnani
    äike+N+Pl+Abe+Use/Rare: äikseteta
    äike+N+Pl+Abe: äikesteta
    äike+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: [äikeseilt, äikesilt, äikseilt, äiksetelt]
    äike+N+Pl+Abl: äikestelt
    äike+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: [äikeseil, äikesil, äikseil, äiksetel]
    äike+N+Pl+Ade: äikestel
    äike+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: [äikeseile, äikesile, äikseile, äiksetele]
    äike+N+Pl+All: äikestele
    äike+N+Pl+Com+Use/Rare: äiksetega
    äike+N+Pl+Com: äikestega
    äike+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: [äikeseist, äikesist, äikseist, äiksetest]
    äike+N+Pl+Ela: äikestest
    äike+N+Pl+Ess+Use/Rare: äiksetena
    äike+N+Pl+Ess: äikestena
    äike+N+Pl+Gen+Use/Rare: äiksete
    äike+N+Pl+Gen: äikeste
    äike+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: [äikeseisse, äikesisse, äikseisse, äiksetesse]
    äike+N+Pl+Ill: äikestesse
    äike+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: [äikeseis, äikesis, äikseis, äiksetes]
    äike+N+Pl+Ine: äikestes
    äike+N+Pl+Nom+Use/Rare: äiksed
    äike+N+Pl+Nom: äikesed
    äike+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: [äikesi, äikseid]
    äike+N+Pl+Par: äikeseid
    äike+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: [äikeseiks, äikesiks, äikseiks, äikseteks]
    äike+N+Pl+Tra: äikesteks
    äike+N+Pl+Trm+Use/Rare: äikseteni
    äike+N+Pl+Trm: äikesteni
    äike+N+Sg+Abe+Use/Rare: äikseta
    äike+N+Sg+Abe: äikeseta
    äike+N+Sg+Abl+Use/Rare: äikselt
    äike+N+Sg+Abl: äikeselt
    äike+N+Sg+Ade+Use/Rare: äiksel
    äike+N+Sg+Ade: äikesel
    äike+N+Sg+All+Use/Rare: äiksele
    äike+N+Sg+All: äikesele
    äike+N+Sg+Com+Use/Rare: äiksega
    äike+N+Sg+Com: äikesega
    äike+N+Sg+Ela+Use/Rare: äiksest
    äike+N+Sg+Ela: äikesest
    äike+N+Sg+Ess+Use/Rare: äiksena
    äike+N+Sg+Ess: äikesena
    äike+N+Sg+Gen+Use/Rare: äikse
    äike+N+Sg+Gen: äikese
    äike+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: [äikesse, äiksesse]
    äike+N+Sg+Ill: äikesesse
    äike+N+Sg+Ine+Use/Rare: äikses
    äike+N+Sg+Ine: äikeses
    äike+N+Sg+Nom+Use/Rare: äikene
    äike+N+Sg+Nom: äike
    äike+N+Sg+Par+Use/Rare: äikset
    äike+N+Sg+Par: äikest
    äike+N+Sg+Tra+Use/Rare: äikseks
    äike+N+Sg+Tra: äikeseks
    äike+N+Sg+Trm+Use/Rare: äikseni
    äike+N+Sg+Trm: äikeseni
    öö+N+Pl+Abe: öödeta
    öö+N+Pl+Abl+Use/Rare: öilt
    öö+N+Pl+Abl: öödelt
    öö+N+Pl+Ade+Use/Rare: öil
    öö+N+Pl+Ade: öödel
    öö+N+Pl+All+Use/Rare: öile
    öö+N+Pl+All: öödele
    öö+N+Pl+Com: öödega
    öö+N+Pl+Ela+Use/Rare: öist
    öö+N+Pl+Ela: öödest
    öö+N+Pl+Ess: öödena
    öö+N+Pl+Gen: ööde
    öö+N+Pl+Ill+Use/Rare: öisse
    öö+N+Pl+Ill: öödesse
    öö+N+Pl+Ine+Use/Rare: öis
    öö+N+Pl+Ine: öödes
    öö+N+Pl+Nom: ööd
    öö+N+Pl+Par+Use/Rare: öösid
    öö+N+Pl+Par: öid
    öö+N+Pl+Tra+Use/Rare: öiks
    öö+N+Pl+Tra: öödeks
    öö+N+Pl+Trm: öödeni
    öö+N+Sg+Abe: ööta
    öö+N+Sg+Abl: öölt
    öö+N+Sg+Ade: ööl
    öö+N+Sg+All: ööle
    öö+N+Sg+Com: ööga
    öö+N+Sg+Ela: ööst
    öö+N+Sg+Ess: ööna
    öö+N+Sg+Gen: öö
    öö+N+Sg+Ill+Use/Rare: öhe
    öö+N+Sg+Ill: öösse
    öö+N+Sg+Ine: öös
    öö+N+Sg+Nom: öö
    öö+N+Sg+Par: ööd
    öö+N+Sg+Tra: ööks
    öö+N+Sg+Trm: ööni
